sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Kampiranje in pohodništvo > Prenosna stranišča in prhe > Prenosna stranišča in naprave za uriniranje: Naprave za uriniranje za ženske; Dodatki naprav za moške za uriniranje; Naprave za uriniranje za moške; Krpice za uriniranje v naravi; Prenosni bideji; Prenosna stranišča za kampiranje; Vrečke in obloge za prenosna stranišča
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Camping og fjellvandring > Portable toaletter og dusjer > Portable toaletter og urineringsapparater: Kvinnelige vannlatingsenheter; Tilbehør til urineringsenheter for menn; Mannlige vannlatingsenheter; Tissekluter; Bærbare bideter; Bærbare campingtoaletter; Poser og innlegg til bærbart toalett
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Camping & Hiking > Portable Toilets & Showers > Portable Toilets & Urination Devices: Female Urination Devices; Male Urination Device Accessories; Male Urination Devices; Pee Cloths; Portable Bidets; Portable Camping Toilets; Portable Toilet Bags & Liners
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Cắm trại & Đi bộ đường dài > Nhà vệ sinh và phòng tắm di động > Thiết bị vệ sinh cá nhân cầm tay: Thiết bị đi tiểu cho nữ; Phụ kiện dụng cụ hỗ trợ đi tiểu cho nam giới; Thiết bị đi tiểu cho nam; Khăn lau vệ sinh đi tiểu; Vòi xịt vệ sinh di động; Nhà vệ sinh cắm trại di động; Túi và lớp lót bồn cầu di động
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Kampçılık ve Doğa Yürüyüşü > Taşınabilir Tuvaletler ve Duşlar > Taşınabilir Tuvaletler ve İdrar Çıkarma Cihazları: Kadın İdrar Tuvaleti Cihazları; Erkek idrar aparatı aksesuarları; Erkek İdrar Tuvaleti Cihazları; İdrar silme bezleri; Taşınabilir bideler; Portatif Kamp Tuvaletleri; Taşınabilir tuvalet poşetleri ve kılıfları
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Stovyklavimas ir žygiai > Nešiojamieji tualetai ir dušai > Nešiojamieji tualetai ir pisuarai: Moteriški pisuarai; Vyriškų šlapinimosi įtaisų priedai; Vyriški pisuarai; Šlapinimosi šluostės; Nešiojamieji bidė; Nešiojami stovyklų tualetai; Nešiojamų tualetų maišeliai ir įdėklai
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Kamperen en wandelen > Mobiele wc's en douches > Mobiele wc's en urinoirs: Urineerapparaten voor vrouwen; Accessoires voor urinoirs voor mannen; Urineerapparaten voor mannen; Plasdoekjes; Draagbare bidets; Mobiele kampeerwc's; Zakken en liners voor draagbare toiletten
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Campismo e caminhada > Chuveiros e sanitas portáteis > Sanitas portáteis e dispositivos para urinação: Dispositivos de urinação femininos; Acessórios para urinóis masculinos; Dispositivos de urinação masculinos; Panos de micção; Bidés portáteis; Casas de banho portáteis para campismo; Sacos e revestimentos para sanitas portáteis
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Camping și drumeții > Toalete și dușuri portabile > Toalete portabile și dispozitive pentru urinat: Dispozitive pentru urinat pentru femei; Accesorii pentru dispozitive de urinare masculină; Dispozitive pentru urinat pentru bărbați; Lavete pentru urină; Bideuri portabile; Toalete portabile de camping; Saci și inserturi pentru toalete portabile
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > キャンプ ・ハイキング > 携帯トイレ・シャワー > 携帯トイレ: 女性用携帯トイレ; 男性用排尿デバイスアクセサリー; 男性用携帯トイレ; 抗菌トイレクロス; 携帯用ビデ; キャンプ用ポータブルトイレ; ポータブルトイレ用バッグ・ライナー
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 캠핑/하이킹 > 휴대용 변기/샤워기 > 휴대용 변기/소변기: 여성용 소변기; 남성용 소변기 액세서리; 남성용 소변기; 피 클로스; 휴대용 비데; 휴대용 캠핑 변기; 휴대용 화장실 봉투 및 라이너
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Camping i chodzenie po górach > Przenośne toalety i prysznice > Przenośne toalety i pisuary: Pisuary damskie; Akcesoria do męskich przyrządów do oddawania moczu; Pisuary męskie; Wielorazowe chusteczki do higieny intymnej; Przenośne bidety; Przenośne toalety kempingowe; Worki i wkłady do toalet turystycznych
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Къмпинг и туризъм > Преносими тоалетни и душове > Преносими тоалетни и устройства за уриниране: Женски устройства за уриниране; Аксесоари за устройства за уриниране за мъже; Мъжки устройства за уриниране; Кърпи за уриниране; Преносими бидета; Преносими къмпинг тоалетни; Чували и торби за преносима тоалетна
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Kampiranje i planinarenje > Prijenosni zahodi i tuševi > Prijenosni zahodi i uređaji za mokrenje: Ženski uređaji za mokrenje; Dodaci za muške uređaje za mokrenje; Muški uređaji za mokrenje; Krpe za mokrenje; Prijenosni bidei; Prijenosni toaleti za kampiranje; Prijenosne toaletne torbe i obloge
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Retkeily ja vaellus > Kannettavat WC:t ja suihkut > Kannettavat WC:t ja virtsasuppilot: Naisten virtsaamislaitteet; Miesten virtsaamisen apuvälineiden lisävarusteet; Miesten virtsaamislaitteet; Virtsauspyyhkeet; Kannettavat bideet; Kannettavat retki-WC:t; Matkakäymälöiden pussit ja suojukset
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Camping et randonnée > Toilettes et douches mobiles > Toilettes et dispositifs urinaires mobiles: Appareils urinaires féminins; Accessoires de dispositifs pour uriner pour hommes; Appareils urinaires masculins; Serviettes urinaires; Bidets portables; Toilettes de camping portables; Sacs et housses pour toilettes portables
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Кемпинги и походы > Походные души и туалеты > Походные туалеты и писсуары: Портативные женские писсуары; Аксессуары для мужских портативных мочеприемников; Портативные мужские писсуары; Гигиенические многоразовые салфетки; Портативные биде; Портативные походные туалеты; Пакеты и вкладыши для портативных туалетов
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Kempování a turistika > Přenosné toalety a sprchy > Přenosné toalety a pisoáry: Zařízení na močení pro ženy; Příslušenství k pánským pomůckám pro močení; Zařízení na močení pro muže; Hadříky pro intimní hygienu; Přenosné bidety; Přenosné kempinkové toalety; Sáčky a vložky do přenosných toalet
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Camping og vandreture > Flytbare toiletter og brusere > Flytbare toiletter og enheder til vandladning: Vandladningsanordninger til kvinder; Tilbehør til urineringsudstyr til mænd; Vandladningsanordninger til mænd; Tisseklude; Bærbare bideter; Transportable campingtoiletter; Poser og indlæg til bærbare toiletter
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Κατασκήνωση & πεζοπορία > Φορητές τουαλέτες & ντους > Φορητές τουαλέτες & συσκευές ούρησης: Συσκευές ούρησης γυναικών; Αξεσουάρ συσκευών ούρησης για άνδρες; Συσκευές ούρησης ανδρών; Πανάκια υγιεινής για ούρηση; Φορητοί μπιντέδες; Φορητές τουαλέτες κάμπινγκ; Σακούλες και καλύμματα φορητών τουαλετών
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 野营与远足 > 移动厕所/淋浴房 > 移动马桶/小便器: 女性小便器; 男士小便器配件; 男性小便器; 户外小便巾; 便携式洗身器; 便携式野营厕所; 便携式马桶垃圾袋与内衬
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 露營和健行 > 流動浴廁 > 流動廁所/小便斗裝置: 女性站尿用具; 男性小便器配件; 男性站尿用具; 排尿擦拭布; 攜帶式沖洗器; 攜帶型露營廁所; 攜帶式馬桶袋與內襯袋
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Kempovanie a turistika > Prenosné toalety a sprchy > Prenosné toalety a zariadenia na močenie: Zariadenia na močenie pre ženy; Príslušenstvo k pomôckam na močenie pre mužov; Zariadenia na močenie pre mužov; Obrúsky na močenie; Prenosné bidety; Prenosné kempingové toalety; Vrecká a vložky do prenosných toaliet
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Campeggio e trekking > Docce e toilette portatili > Bagni da campeggio e orinatoi portatili: Dispositivi per la minzione femminile; Accessori per dispositivi per minzione maschili; Dispositivi per la minzione maschile; Panni igienici riutilizzabili; Bidet portatili; Toilette da campeggio portatili; Sacchetti e rivestimenti per WC portatili
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Kemping és túrázás > Hordozható WC-k és zuhanyzók > Hordozható WC-k és vizeletürítő eszközök: Női vizeletürítő készülékek; Férfi vizelést segítő eszközök kiegészítői; Férfi vizeletürítő készülékek; Törlőkendők vizeléshez; Hordozható bidék; Hordozható kemping WC-k; Hordozható wc-zsákok és -betétek
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > การตั้งแคมป์และเดินเขา > ห้องน้ำและที่อาบน้ำเคลื่อนที่ > อุปกรณ์ห้องน้ำและโถส้วมเคลื่อนที่: อุปกรณ์โถส้วมสำหรับสตรี; อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับอุปกรณ์ช่วยปัสสาวะผู้ชาย; อุปกรณ์โถส้วมสำหรับบุรุษ; ผ้าเช็ดทำความสะอาดหลังปัสสาวะ; สายฉีดชำระพกพา; ห้องน้ำเคลื่อนที่สำหรับการตั้งแคมป์; ถุงและแผ่นรองโถส้วมพกพา
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Acampamento e caminhada > Chuveiros e banheiros portáteis > Banheiros portáteis: Dispositivos para urinar feminino; Acessórios para dispositivos de micção masculinos; Dispositivos para urinar masculino; Panos higiênicos reutilizáveis; Bidês portáteis; Banheiros portáteis para acampamento; Sacos e forros para sanitários portáteis
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Camping, vandring och backpacking > Portabla toaletter och duschar > Portabla toaletter och urinbehållare: Urinbehållare för kvinnor; Tillbehör för urineringshjälpmedel för män; Urinbehållare för män; Kissdukar; Bärbara bidéer; Bärbara campingtoaletter; Påsar och inlägg för bärbara toaletter
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Camping & Wandern > Mobile Toiletten & Duschen > Mobile Toiletten & Urinale: Frauenurinale; Zubehör für Urinierhilfen für Männer; Männerurinale; Urintücher; Tragbare Bidets; Mobile Campingtoiletten; Beutel & Einlagen für tragbare Toiletten
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Camping y senderismo > Duchas y retretes portátiles > Urinarios y retretes portátiles: Dispositivos para la micción femenina; Accesorios para dispositivos de micción masculina; Dispositivos para la micción masculina; Paños para orina; Bidetes portátiles; Inodoros portátiles de camping; Bolsas y revestimientos para inodoros portátiles